Ohio, session 136, SB409.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5.64 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.64. The eleventh day of February is designated as "Thomas Edison Day" in recognition of Thomas Alva Edison, the inventor who was born on that day in Milan, Ohio, in 1847.